District of Columbia statutes.
50-2621

Repealed

Vehicles impounded; abandoned and junk vehicles; penalties.

Repealed.

Jan. 15, 1942, 56 Stat. 5, ch. 4, § 1
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 504, 25 DCR 1275
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-146, § 2, 29 DCR 3151
Sept. 9, 1989, D.C. Law 8-24, § 7(a), 36 DCR 4575
Aug. 4, 1990, D.C. Law 8-153, § 3, 37 DCR 4042
Sept. 26, 1990, D.C. Law 8-170, § 3, 37 DCR 4839
Feb. 28, 1996, D.C. Law 11-95, § 3(a), 42 DCR 7180
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, §§ 44, 64, 46 DCR 2118
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-267, § 2, 48 DCR 1248
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 13(e)(1), 50 DCR 6579
1981 Ed., § 40-812.
1973 Ed., § 40-810.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Prohibition on Abandoned Vehicles Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-526, December 16, 1998, 45 DCR 15).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 13(e)(1) of the Removal and Disposition of Abandoned, Dangerous and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 15-104, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5534).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 13(e)(1) of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).
Section 12 of D.C. Law 8-24 provided that the act shall take effect after a 30-day period of Congressional review following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council of the District of Columbia to override the veto) as provided in § 1-206.02(c)(1), and publication in either the District of Columbia Register, the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large, or the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations; or by November 1, 1989, whichever occurs later. D.C. Law 8-24 was effective September 9, 1989.
The functions of the Department of Transportation were transferred to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.

Application of 15-35: Section 15 of D.C. Law 15-35 provided: “This act shall apply to all vehicles impounded after its effective date. This act shall also apply to all vehicles impounded prior to its effective date provided that notice is sent to the owners and lien holders in accordance with the provisions of subsections 7(b) or (c), as is applicable.”

Effect of repeal provisions: Section 14 of D.C. Law 15-35 provided: “Any repeal of a law or regulation by this act shall not invalidate any enforcement action, adjudication, or any other action made or taken pursuant to such law or regulation.”

Driveway parking pilot program: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-186 provided:

“(a) The Mayor shall conduct at least one temporary pilot program of 6 months to test the feasability of allowing a District resident with a driveway in front of his or her home to park a vehicle on the street in front of the driveway entrance, notwithstanding the prohibition in section 2405 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations.

“(b) Within 3 months of the conclusion of the temporary pilot program, the Mayor shall present to the Council a report detailing the results of the pilot program, which shall include:

“(1) A section on comments from homeowners, visitors, and business owners regarding their experiences with the pilot program; and

“(2) The Mayor’s recommendations for or against moving forward with the program citywide.”